Nevada, session 83, SB150.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. On or before October 1, 2025, the Department
of Health and Human Services shall submit to the United States
Secretary of Health and Human Services a request to amend the
State Plan for Medicaid to increase to at least $15.34 per hour, or as
close to that amount as the Secretary approves, the rate of
reimbursement which is provided on a fee-for-service basis pursuant
-
*SB150*

– 2 –
to the State Plan for medication-assisted treatment provided by an
opioid treatment program provider.
2. The request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
supported using methods for determining reimbursement rates
accepted by the Secretary.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB150*